Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5550.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10g. (1) If, in the opinion of the commissioner, a person has engaged in fraud or money laundering, the commissioner may serve upon that the person with a written notice of intention to prohibit that person from being employed by, an agent of, or control person of a licensee under this act or a licensee or registrant under a financial licensing act. (2) A notice issued under subsection (1) shall must contain a statement of the facts supporting the prohibition and, except as provided under subsection (7), set a hearing to be held not more than 60 days after the date of the notice. If the person does not appear at the hearing, he or she the person is considered to have consented to the issuance of an order in accordance with the notice. (3) If, after a hearing held under subsection (2), the commissioner finds that any of the grounds specified in the notice have been established, the commissioner may issue an order of suspension or prohibition from being a licensee or registrant or from being employed by, an agent of, or control person of any licensee under this act or a licensee or registrant under a financial licensing act. (4) An order issued under subsection (2) or (3) is effective upon service upon the person. on the date that the person is served with the order. The commissioner shall also serve a copy of the order upon on the licensee of which to whom the person is an employee, agent, or control person. The order remains in effect effective until it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by the commissioner or a reviewing court. (5) After 5 years from the date of an order issued under subsection (2) or (3), the person subject to the order may apply to the commissioner to terminate the order. (6) If the commissioner considers that a person served a notice under subsection (1) poses an imminent threat of financial loss to applicants for loans, mortgage loans, secondary mortgage loans, credit card arrangements, or installment sales credit, borrowers on loans, obligors on installment sale contracts, loan servicing customers, purchasers of mortgage loans or interests in mortgage loans, or purchasers of services for money transmission, services as defined in section 2 of the money transmission services act, the commissioner may serve upon the person with an order of suspension from being employed by, an agent of, or control person of any licensee. The suspension is effective on the date the order is issued and, unless stayed by a court, remains in effect pending the completion of a review as provided under this section and the commissioner has dismissed the charges specified in the order. (7) Unless otherwise agreed to by the commissioner and the person served with an order issued under subsection (6), the hearing required under subsection (2) to review the suspension shall must be held not earlier than 5 days or later than 20 days after the date of the notice. (8) If a person is convicted of a crime involving fraud, dishonesty, money laundering, or breach of trust, the commissioner may issue an order suspending or prohibiting that person from being a licensee and from being employed by, an agent of, or control person of any licensee under this act or a licensee or registrant under a financial licensing act. After 5 years from the date of the order, the person subject to the order may apply to the commissioner to terminate the order. (9) The commissioner shall mail a copy of any notice or order issued under this section to the licensee of which the person subject to the notice or order is an employee, agent, or control person. (10) As used in this section: (a) "Fraud" includes actionable fraud, actual or constructive fraud, criminal fraud, extrinsic or intrinsic fraud, fraud in the execution, in the inducement, in fact, or in law, or any other form of fraud. (b) "Money laundering" means conduct by 1 or more persons that conceals the existence, illegal source, or illegal application of income and then disguises that income to make it appear legitimate. Money laundering includes, but is not limited to, conduct that violates any state or federal law that imposes a criminal penalty for money laundering. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2026. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5544 (request no. H02309'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.